District of Columbia statutes.
47-2886.04

Practice of engineering without registration prohibited.

Any person engaged in or offering to engage in the practice of engineering in the District of Columbia shall submit evidence that he is qualified to practice and shall be registered as hereinafter provided; and it shall be unlawful for any person to engage or offer to engage in the practice of engineering in the District of Columbia, or by verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, or in any other way, represent himself to be a professional engineer, or through the use of the title including the word “engineer” or words of like import, or any other title, imply that he is a professional engineer, unless such person is registered under the provisions of this part.

Sept. 19, 1950, 64 Stat. 855, ch. 953, § 4
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

History

1981 Ed., § 2-2304.
1973 Ed., § 2-1804.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.

Effect of Amendments